trunk/apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.mk.dix.xml
    <pardef n="пријав/и__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative пријав/и -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ете</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Present пријав/и -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ам</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>иш</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>име</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ите</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ат</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	<!-- Aorist пријав/и -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ив</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ивме</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ивте</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ија</l>
          <r>и<s n="vblex"/><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    

   <pardef n="глед/а__vblex">
	<!-- Imperative -->
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ај</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ајте</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ам</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>аш</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>аме</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>ате</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>аат</l>
         <r>а<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="нула__num">
      <e>
        <p>
         <l/>
	  <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
   <pardef n="сел/о__n">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>о</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
   </pardef>
    <pardef n="ед/ен__num">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ен</l>
         <r>ен<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>на</l>
         <r>ен<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>но</l>
         <r>ен<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="дв/а__num">
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>е</l>
         <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>а</l>
         <r>а<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- придавки -->

    <pardef n="P__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>по</l>
          <r>по<s n="pref"/><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>нај</l>
          <r>нај<s n="pref"/><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><j/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- passthrough -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r/>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="висок__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="кра/ен__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ен</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јна</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јно</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>јни</l>
          <r>ен<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="летачк/и__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>а</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>о</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>и</l>
          <r>и<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="доб/ар__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ар</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__m_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ра</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__f_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ро</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__nt_sg_def"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ри</l>
          <r>ар<s n="adj"/><s n="pve"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__mf_pl_def"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <e lm="планира"><i>планир</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="додава"><i>додав</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="утврдува"><i>утврдув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="купува"><i>купув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="емитува"><i>емитув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="обучува"><i>обучув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="разгледува"><i>разгледув</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="брка"><i>брк</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="праќа"><i>праќ</i><par n="глед/а__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="овозможи"><i>овозмож</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="врати"><i>врат</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="изрази"><i>израз</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="загрози"><i>загроз</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="изјасни"><i>изјасн</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="оби"><i>об</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="послужи"><i>послуж</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="размени"><i>размен</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="усогласи"><i>усоглас</i><par n="пријав/и__vblex"/></e>
   <e lm="еден"><i>ед</i><par n="ед/ен__num"/></e>
   <e lm="два"><i>дв</i><par n="дв/а__num"/></e>
   <e lm="четири"><i>четири</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="шест"><i>шест</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="осум"><i>осум</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="десет"><i>десет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="дванаесет"><i>дванаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="четирнаест"><i>четирнаест</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="шеснаесет"><i>шеснаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="осумнаесет"><i>осумнаесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="дваесет"><i>дваесет</i><par n="нула__num"/></e>
   <e lm="велик"><par n="P__adj"/><i>велик</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="дипломиран"><par n="P__adj"/><i>дипломиран</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="неприкосновен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>неприкосновен</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="нововлезен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>нововлезен</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="истакнат"><par n="P__adj"/><i>истакнат</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="изваден"><par n="P__adj"/><i>изваден</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="подобрен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>подобрен</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="блиндиран"><par n="P__adj"/><i>блиндиран</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="обвинуван"><par n="P__adj"/><i>обвинуван</i><par n="висок__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="канадски"><par n="P__adj"/><i>канадск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="токиски"><par n="P__adj"/><i>токиск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="фудбалски"><par n="P__adj"/><i>фудбалск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="италјански"><par n="P__adj"/><i>италјанск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="планински"><par n="P__adj"/><i>планинск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="површински"><par n="P__adj"/><i>површинск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="скопски"><par n="P__adj"/><i>скопск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="амбасадорски"><par n="P__adj"/><i>амбасадорск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="филозофски"><par n="P__adj"/><i>филозофск</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="разбојнички"><par n="P__adj"/><i>разбојничк</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="исламистички"><par n="P__adj"/><i>исламистичк</i><par n="летачк/и__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="добар"><par n="P__adj"/><i>доб</i><par n="доб/ар__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="храбар"><par n="P__adj"/><i>храб</i><par n="доб/ар__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="мудар"><par n="P__adj"/><i>муд</i><par n="доб/ар__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="остар"><par n="P__adj"/><i>ост</i><par n="доб/ар__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="кутар"><par n="P__adj"/><i>кут</i><par n="доб/ар__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="долготраен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>долготра</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="сообраќаен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>сообраќа</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="стечаен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>стеча</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="случаен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>случа</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="идеен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>иде</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="семеен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>семе</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="двоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>дво</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="покоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>поко</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="самостоен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>самосто</i><par n="кра/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="арбитражен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>арбитраж</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="културен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>култур</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
   <e lm="раскошен"><par n="P__adj"/><i>раскош</i><par n="инвентив/ен__adj"/></e>
